District of Columbia statutes.
38-1107

Land-grant colleges.

In the administration of: (1) the Act of August 30, 1890 (7 U.S.C. §§ 321 to 326 , and 328 ) (known as the Second Morrill Act); (2) the 10th paragraph under the heading “Emergency Appropriations” in the Act of March 4, 1907 (7 U.S.C. § 322 ) (known as the Nelson Amendment); (3) section 22 of the Act of June 29, 1935 (7 U.S.C. § 329 ) (known as the Bankhead-Jones Act); (4) the Act of March 4, 1940 (7 U.S.C. §§ 1621 to 1627 ); (5) the Agricultural Marketing Act of 1946 (7 U.S.C. §§ 1621 to 1627 , 1628 [repealed], 1629); and (6) section 38-1108 ; the Federal City College and the Washington Technical Institute shall each be considered to be a college established for the benefit of agriculture and the mechanic arts in accordance with the provisions of the Act of July 2, 1862 (7 U.S.C. §§ 301 to 305 , 307 , and 308 ) (known as the First Morrill Act); and the term “state” as used in the laws and provisions of law listed in the preceding clauses of this section shall include the District of Columbia.

History

Nov. 7, 1966, Pub. L. 89-791, title I, § 107
June 20, 1968, 82 Stat. 241, Pub. L. 90-354, § 1
Jan. 5, 1971, 84 Stat. 1935, Pub. L. 91-650, title IV, § 401(a)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 38-1110, § 38-1111, and § 38-1112.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1407.
1973 Ed., § 31-1607.